











































BUDBO
GLOBAL CANNABIS BLOCKCHAIN

A COMPREHENSIVE BLOCKCHAIN  
SOLUTION FOR THE CANNABIS INDUSTRY

WHITEPAPER:  VERSION 1.6
L A S T U P D AT E D: F E B R U A RY 27,  2018

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Contents
Forward Looking Statements .................................................................................................................... 3

Securities Laws Disclaimer ........................................................................................................................ 3

Founders’ Letter ............................................................................................................................................ 6

Key Definitions .............................................................................................................................................. 7

Abstract .......................................................................................................................................................... 8

Budbo Platform Ecosystem ....................................................................................................................... 9

Project Background ...................................................................................................................................10

Mission .........................................................................................................................................................11

Unique Model ..............................................................................................................................................12

Use Case ......................................................................................................................................................13

Budbo Business Model .............................................................................................................................15

Token Sale....................................................................................................................................................17

Budbo Token Description ..........................................................................................................................18

Token Diagram ............................................................................................................................................19

Transparency & Community Control ......................................................................................................20

How to Get Budbo Tokens  .......................................................................................................................21

Budbo Platform and Mobile App .............................................................................................................23

Market Context  ..........................................................................................................................................27

Government Regulations ..........................................................................................................................29

Project Roadmap ........................................................................................................................................30

Team .............................................................................................................................................................32

Advisors ........................................................................................................................................................34

Partners ........................................................................................................................................................46

Risk Factors .................................................................................................................................................47

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 2

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



This White Paper contains forward-looking 
statements within the meaning of the U.S. 
federal securities laws, which involve substantial 
risks and uncertainties. The forward-looking 
statements involve known and unknown risks, 
uncertainties and other factors that may cause 
our actual results, performance or achievements 
to be materially different from any future results, 
performances or achievements expressed or 
implied by the forward-looking statements, many 
of which are beyond the control of Budbo Token 
International, LTD. and Budbo, Inc. These risks 
and uncertainties include, but are not limited to, 
the factors described in the section captioned 
“Risk Factors.” In some cases, you can identify 
forward-looking statements by terms such 
as “anticipates,” “believes,” “could,” “estimates,” 
“expects,” “intends,” “may,” “plans,” “potential,” 
“predicts,” “projects,” “should,” “would” and similar 
expressions intended to identify forward-looking 
statements. 

These risks and uncertainties include, but are 
not limited to: (i) the timing to consummate 
the proposed Token Sale; (ii) the risk that the 
proposed sale of Budbo Tokens might otherwise 
not occur, whether as a result of the current token 
sale regulatory limitations or otherwise; (iii) the 
risk of criminalization of cannabis sales and/
or cannabis related products by an applicable 
governmental jurisdiction (including the U.S.); 
(iv) the risk that a regulatory approval that may 
be required for the proposed sale is not obtained 
or is obtained subject to conditions that are not 
anticipated; (v) the diversion of management time 
on transaction-related or issues; (vi) the ability 
of Budbo, Inc.’s management to successfully 
implement its business plan; or (vii) general 
market factors and federal and state regulations 
and legislation. Forward-looking statements 
reflect our current views with respect to future 
events and are based on assumptions and are 
subject to risks and uncertainties.  

Forward Looking 
Statements

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 3

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Given these uncertainties, you should not 
place undue reliance on these forward-looking 
statements. Also, forward-looking statements 
represent our estimates and assumptions only 
as of the date of this White Paper. You should 
read this White Paper completely and with the 
understanding that our actual future results may 
be materially different from what we expect. We 
qualify all of the forward-looking statements 
by these cautionary statements. We assume 
no obligation to update any forward-looking 
statements publicly, or to update the reasons 
actual results could differ materially from those 
anticipated in any forward-looking statements, 
even if new information becomes available in the 
future.” 

Forward Looking 
Statements Cont.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 4

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Securities Laws  
Disclaimer
Section 2 of the Securities Act of 1933, as 
amended, defines “security” as: “any note, stock, 
treasury stock, security feature, security-based 
swap, bond, debenture, evidence of indebtedness, 
certificate of interest or participation in any profit-
sharing agreement, collateral-trust certificate, 
preorganization certificate of subscription, 
transferable share, investment contract, voting-
trust certificate, certificate of deposit for a security, 
fractional undivided interest in oil, gas, or other 
mineral rights, any put, call, straddle, option, or 
privilege on any security, certificate of deposit, or  
group or index of securities (including any interest 
therein or based on the value thereof), or any put, 
call, straddle, option, or privilege entered into on 
a national securities exchange relating to foreign 
currency, or, in general, any interest or instrument 
commonly known as a “security,” or any certificate 
of interest or participation in, temporary or interim 
certificate for, receipt for, guarantee of, or warrant 
or right to subscribe to or purchase, any of the 
foregoing

Budbo Tokens do not represent or confer any 
ownership right, stake, share or security or equivalent 
rights, or any right to receive future revenue share 
or profits, intellectual property rights or any other 
form of participation in or relating to Budbo Token 
International, LTD., Budbo, Inc. and their respective 
corporate affiliates, including the governance of 
Budbo Token International, LTD. and Budbo, Inc. 
Budbo Tokens are not intended to be a digital 
currency, security, commodity, expectation of profit 
or any other kind of financial instrument.

In recognition of the fact that the United States 
government has provided limited guidance and has 
not passed any laws with respect to the sale of digital 
tokens, we believe it best that no United States-
based individuals participate in the purchase of the 
Budbo Tokens. 

In addition, foreign investors should be aware of laws 
prohibiting its residents from participating in initial 
coin offerings (ICOs) or token sales, particularly in 
Canada, South Korea, China and Singapore.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 5

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Budbo’s journey has taken many paths, touched 
many lives, and connected a great number of 
people.  Since you are reading this, you are now 
a part of that journey. Thank you for your time 
and consideration.

Budbo began as a simple idea; we wished to 
connect patients and users with the highest 
quality, locally available cannabis products.  Yet 
within this simple mission, we realized we had 
created something much more extraordinary: a 
platform on which dispensaries, manufacturers, 
and growers can get the most accurate data 
possible on patient and user preferences.  

A synergy was born. We quickly noticed a direct 
correlation between the number of patients 
using the application and the diversity of the local 
product offering around them.  In short, the more 
patients exploring products and finding flower 
through the application, the better and more 
targeted information our network of growers, 
manufacturers, and dispensaries would receive 
through the Budbo dashboard.  Allowing them to 
make spot-on forecasting decisions when it comes 
to product trends, whether that be which products 
to buy and stock their shelves with, which strains 
to grow and cultivate, or which concentrates or 
edibles to manufacture and distribute - Budbo 
bridged the gaps between patient, dispensary, 
manufacturer, and grower.

Business was good, and to accommodate 
our growing cannabis network we expanded 
our product offering to include real-time GPS 
tracking of cannabis shipments.

Our current network consists of roughly 75,000 
users and patients, 2,000+ dispensaries, 500+ 
product manufacturers, and 50+ grow operations.

Growing into a worldwide network has been 
a challenging but steady climb. Now we 
elevate our offering even further by utilizing 
the immutable ledger of blockchain and the 
tokenization of our platform.

Imagine, if you will, the entire cannabis industry as 
a decentralized autonomous organization.  Where 
a patient’s identification and medication regimen 
are encrypted and safely stored within the ledger 
of a blockchain.  Where a smart contract enables 
the safe transfer of goods through verifiable proof 
of pick up, bill of lading, and proof of delivery. 
Medical testing of cannabis potency is verified 
and immutable as the product is moved from lab 
to dispensary.  The community at large is a self-
governing group of activists, patients, physicians, 
developers, artists and enthusiasts all working 
towards the common goal of improving the 
cannabis industry through contributing votes, time, 
engineering and knowledge to the decentralized 
applications and network of Budbo.

This can be our future. We can make it a reality. 
Thank you for your contribution of time, treasure, 
and effort. 

Sincerely,
Jacob and Luke Patterson

Founders, Budbo.

Founders’ Letter

“Before everything else,  getting ready is the 
secret to success.” - Henry Ford

Anyone can come stumble onto a big idea. But not 
everyone is willing to invest the time, energy and sweat 

equity to bring it to life.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 6

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Dispensaries/Retailers
A dispensary refers to any retail store where cannabis, or cannabis-
related products are sold.

Customers
A Customer is a recreational user or medical patient of cannabis.

Manufacturers
A manufacturer refers to a company that makes cannabis-related 
goods and products. This is a diverse group that could include a bakery 
that produces cannabis-infused brownies, known as edibles, or a 
company that produces highly potent THC concentrates such as wax.

Growers/Cultivators
A company or person who grows cannabis.

Courier/Transport
A person who ships or delivers cannabis.

Labs - Testing
Cannabis flower and products are tested for their THC and CBD 
content percentages.

Suppliers - Bottling Services, Labels, Nutrients
Suppliers are auxiliary cannabis companies that do not deal directly 
with the cannabis plant but still make products for the industry, such 
as nutrients or lights for growers, or bottles for dispensaries.

Seed to Sale
Seed to Sale refers to the compliance side of tracking a cannabis plant 
throughout its lifecycle.  From a seed, to its vegetation state, to its 
weight at harvest, and finally to the sale of the product.

Key    Definitions

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 7

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Even though the legalization of cannabis is gaining traction, the cannabis industry is still largely 
fragmented due to the economic ecosystem that remains shrouded in black market practices. Budbo 
will be the first-of-its-kind, fully integrated blockchain-based solution for the transparent, standardized, 
and regulated interaction between cannabis users, dispensaries and couriers.

Budbo is a best-in-class platform already actively being used by more than 75,000 mobile users and over 
2000 suppliers (dispensaries). Budbo consists of a mobile phone app and a cloud-based backend business 
intelligence platform. The platform is designed to match cannabis users’ top picks or close matches of 
cannabis strains and products and direct them to nearby dispensaries which are carrying these products. 
The platform also provides a delivery tracking service aimed at ensuring full visibility and compliance into the 
cannabis delivery process. Budbo has over 150 vehicles currently being tracked every day. 

The blockchain technology offers a way to gloablize all these channels simultaneously as it holds an 
immutable ledger that leverages crypto-tokens built on smart contracts. Budbo Token transactions will 

be instant, and average transaction 
confirmation time will be within 
minutes. All transactions will be 
secured with state-of- the-art 
cryptography, and blockchain integrity 
will be protected by CPU efficient ASIC 
resistant proof of work. This unique 
model allows us to fill numerous 
operational and process gaps for 
cannabis businesses. 

The adoption of blockchain 
cryptocurrency technology is the next 
logical step in the development and 
growth of Budbo’s platform. It enables 
us to create a structure that solves 
many of the issues surrounding the 
supply chain management of the 
cannabis industry.

Abstract

To round out the product offering and provide a secure 
payment method and rewards program, we are now 
combining this cannabis product pursuit and tracking 
platform with the crypto blockchain model. The 
blockchain model will easily accommodate several stages 
of the cannabis pursuit, sales and logistics processes, 
addressing the following: 

• Recording and Storing Product Life Cycle Events

• Verifying Patient Identification

• Transaction Assurance

• Equipment Ordering

• Inventory Management

• Seed to Sale Tracking

• Client Management

• Delivery Tracking and Verification

• Platform Analytics

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 8

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



 Budbo Platform  
      Ecosystem

Budbo’s Blockchain becomes the backbone of immutable, verifiable data security, upon which all layers 
of API and activity utilize the Budbo Token(BUBO) as the API access key.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 9

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



The growth of the cannabis industry has been 
unparalleled in recent years with the uses and 
applications of marijuana being further explored 
and instituted. This has brought the industry into 
the legal light, creating a need for the different 
components to act together in order to strengthen 
the burgeoning business. However, as it stands, 
there is significant separation between cannabis 
producers, growers, labs, craftsmen, and 
dispensaries.

Budbo, Inc. is propelling the cannabis industry 
forward by building a global blockchain-
based immutable ledger and implementing a 
utility token for consumers, retailers, growers, 
manufacturers and the entire global cannabis 
network.

Budbo’s best-in-class mobile app stores industry 
data in the blockchain to provide retailers with 

real-time analytics on consumer preferences. 
Deliveries are tracked in real-time via GPS, with 
all  true data and compliant documentation 
instantly stored in the blockchain’s immutable 
ledger. This provides an unprecedented solution 
for the secure storage of all historical records.  

Budbo International’s utility tokens enable 
integration of the Budbo blockchain to all third-
parties via API, allowing for a single point, data-
driven cannabis environment to quickly flourish.

Budbo functions as a cloud-based platform 
that brings together all relevant parties in 
the cannabis industry in order to increase 
standardization, transparency and efficiency 
across channels. Budbo offers a unified solution 
for cannabis businesses and users to transact 
safely, securely and in compliance with federal 
and state regulations.

Project Background

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 10

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



The unique challenges faced by the cannabis 
industry call for a new solution. Despite the fact 
that there is an enormous and long-established 
market, it remains historically illegal and difficult 
to access for businesses. The rapid growth and 
expansion of the sector makes it especially  
lucrative for dispensaries and transporters, 
particularly through the increasingly legalized 
channels. Consumers in the US spent over $53 
billion on cannabis in 2016 alone, that number 
more then quadruples when looked at on a global 
scale. Through medical research and progression 
the industry is transitioning into a large legal 
economy, and Budbo can be a major factor in 
facilitating this historical change.

Budbo aims to address the fragmentation 
and marginalization in the cannabis industry 
through the creation of a unified platform that 

enables a unified cannabis seed to sale and 

supply chain management process on a global 

platform. We will base our efforts around a 

new Budbo blockchain and token. The Budbo 

Token ($BUBO) will fund our efforts through 

a Token Sale, in a strategic effort to remain 

as decentralized from traditional forms as 

possible. Our goal is to be the first cannabis-

focused platform that meets the needs of users, 

suppliers (dispensaries) and couriers built on the 

blockchain crypto-technology. We aim to be the 

one-stop platform that will integrate, accelerate 

and facilitate a new generation of transparency 

and social interaction in the rapidly growing and 

increasingly legalized cannabis industry.

Mission

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 11

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Budbo’s unique ‘tinder model’ has proven to be 
highly effective in driving alignment between our 
business and operating models. The combination 
of a best-in-class mobile app and business 
intelligence tool empowers users to connect 
and interact in ways that have never been 
possible. By adopting the social component of 
popular networks like Tinder, Budbo facilitates 
communication with people and streamlines the 
shopping process through robust algorithms to 
aid users in the matching process of best “strain 
matches”. The incorporation of the blockchain 
cryptocurrency model will enable us to take the 
Budbo platform to the next level of development 
by properly fulfilling our value proposition and 
capturing a portion of the value created through:

• Driving user adoption and engagement

• Maintaining a stable, functioning, and 
accessible mobile application

• Evolving the business tool’s functionality 
to meet changing user and supplier 
demands

The Budbo blockchain ecosystem will store 
transactional records in the blockchain 
throughout the life cycle of a product, including 
all relevant data about the end to end process. 
Moreover, the end user can discover new strains 
in ways never before possible. Dispensaries 
gain invaluable data on local user preferences, 
and benefit from key analytics to know which 
strains to grow and which products to stock in 
order to increase sales and grow revenue. The 
data exchange happens through APIs which are 
accessed by the Budbo Token. 

The global cannabis data exchange environment 
that Budbo, Inc provides is built on blockchain & 
smart contracts, with data stored in immutable 
ledgers. This establishes Budbo Inc. as the single 
source of true unmanipulated data for the global 
cannabis network. 

With an already established (and growing) base of 
more than 75,000 recurring users, Budbo delivers 
critical business intelligence to dispensaries, 
leading to proactive decision-making. Integrating 
the blockchain cryptocurrency model into 
Budbo’s existing structure will solve many issues 
surrounding the supply chain management of 
the cannabis industry. The Budbo Token sale 
will create the first and only cannabis blockchain 
network that utilizes a utility token as the monetary 
exchange creating enormous long term value in the 
token.

Unique Model

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 12

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Why Budbo  
Is Needed
Budbo is the first platform for the global cannabis 
industry built on Blockchain technology and 
Smart Contracts. We combine retailers, labs, 
manufacturers, cultivators, and logistics into 
a decentralized, open and honest network, 
making the cannabis industry transparent, and 
accountable, especially on a global scale.

Budbo’s core functionality is to provide a distributed 
ledger to the cannabis industry, creating a true 
industry backbone of storage and APIs on which all 
levels of ancillary services can harness the power 
and security of the blockchain. 

From a technology perspective, the rapidly evolving 
marijuana industry presents a unique opportunity: 
legalized sales of cannabis on a massive 
scale. This fast-growing sector of the economy 
presents challenges that have not been dealt with 
before, partly because even in states that have 
legalized the sale of marijuana, cannabis-related 
businesses still face many business restrictions 
and inefficiencies. This is particularly true when it 
comes to legal protection, consumer outreach, and 
supply chain management.

We are now seeing a strong and effective push 
for the federal government to establish, regulate, 
and encourage an open and fair market for the 
use and sale of cannabis and cannabis-related 
products.  Legal cannabis sales in the United 
States are up 17 percent since 2015, to $5.4 
billion, and are expected to grow 25 percent in 
the next year to $6.7 billion, according to Arcview 
Market Research. By 2020 legal cannabis sales 
in the United States are projected to hit $21.8 
billion. However the industry is still struggling 
with a patchwork of laws and regulations, as well 
as a lack of standardization to allow for the legal 
trade of cannabis.  The same is true on a the 
global scale as several countries have moved to 
legalize and standarzie cannabis to consumers.

Blockchain technology presents a solution to 
most of these problems. Smart contracts built on 
blockchain transcend borders and unite interested 
parties throughout the cannabis industry. Budbo’s 
application and back-end platform can help make 
the industry safe, responsible, and organized via 
standardization and tokenization. 

Now is the ideal time to take advantage of 
the growth potential of the cannabis industry. 
Budbo creates a structure and technology that 
solves many issues surrounding management 
of the cannabis supply chain, and provides 
governments with a compliance solution.

Use Case

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 13

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Budbo’s Blockchain

Budbo’s Blockchain becomes the backbone of immutable, verifiable data security, upon which all layers of 
API and activity utilize the Budbo Token(BUBO) as the API access key. .

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 14

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Front-end – Budbo App: Budbo app is a one-
of-a-kind mobile application that allows users 
to quickly discover, explore, and locate new 
strains, concentrates, and edibles like never 
before. The Budbo app will have the capacity 
to connect dispensaries, growers and other 
entities in the cannabis network in one 
blockchain-crypto ecosystem. 

Back-end – Budbo Platform: Budbo operates as 
a one-stop service for marijuana dispensaries 
and end-users, giving the cannabis industry 
a new level of consumer convenience and 
business intelligence.

The Budbo mobile app is built to maintain a rapidly 
growing base of users, products and dispensaries. 
Budbo’s structure and culture is designed to 
be fast-moving and responsive to consumer 
demands. We continue to maintain the highest 
standards for our current platform, while also 
planning for future growth. This planning includes 
building out our internal system, migrating from 
cloud services to a blockchain infrastructure, and 
automating certain processes. This is all critical to 
continuing Budbo’s rapid growth.

Budbo’s unique ‘tinder model’ also captures 
value by offering advertisement potential for 
suppliers (dispensaries). The Budbo “strain 
match” feature requires users to input desired 
effects. Dispensaries can then use that 

information to suggest new products. The user 
can immediately swipe left or right or click on 
links for more information. 

The adoption of the Blockchain model will allow 
the Budbo application to deliver working modular 
code and a sandbox environment to minimize 
development time, infrastructure and investment. 
The application will use an agile design approach 
and industry-leading Ethereum blockchain 
technology. Budbo’s blockchain application will 
be available via the cloud and compatible with 
today’s hybrid cloud environment. This will allow 
dispensaries to experiment without additional 
infrastructure expenses and get to market faster 
to a global community of marijuana users.

Blockchain technology is an emerging way 
for businesses, industries, and governments 
to almost instantaneously make and verify 
transactions—streamlining business processes, 
saving money, and reducing the potential 
for fraud.  At its core, a blockchain is a data 
structure that is used to create a digital 
transaction ledger that, instead of resting with 
a single provider, is shared among a distributed 
network of computers.

The result is a more open, transparent, and 
publicly verifiable platform that will fundamentally 
change the way users, dispensaries and couriers 
interact and exchange value and assets, enforce 

Budbo Business Model

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 15

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



contracts, and share data across channels. The 
Budbo application using blockchain creates 
almost limitless possibilities for growth and social 
interaction, ranging from product matches and 
direct organic advertising to instant payments 
and more efficient supply chain and inventory 
management.

Because the Budbo application and business 
tool is by design a “community-based” platform, 
where tasks, functions, goals and priorities 
are defined and re-defined in real-time by the 
community, it allows for greater freedom and 
flexibility for users, suppliers (dispensaries) and 
couriers. The backbone of the Budbo platform is 
the mechanism by which users can select and 
match their preferred choice of products with the 
dispensaries that sell them. One of the incentives 
that will drive consumers and suppliers to use the 
Budbo platform is the fact that it will encourage 
interactions between all parties and create value 
across channels. We achieve this by removing 
the burdensome signup process of existing 
platforms, as well as putting the match making 
power in the user’s control with a simple and 
streamlined interface.

Budbo’s major advantage over other platforms 
is that it does much more than simply utilize  
blockchain technology. Our platform is 
completely user-centric, which means users 
are and will remain at the heart of what we do. 

Our support for the cannabis community will 
be shown through transaction transparency 
and information sharing. We have created a 
complete technology solution that benefits 
dispensaries, growers, merchants, couriers and 
consumers in the blockchain.

The Budbo Token Sale will allow the user base to 
grow globally and create a global cannabis data 
exchange network.  The Budbo Token will be the 
API token that allows acess to the information 
grid and data flow within the Budbo ecosystem.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 16

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Total Issued Tokens
200,000,000 Tokens Issued 

Tokens
150,000,000 for Token Sale

Contribution Tiers
$0.25 (Tier 1) (Jan, 29 - Feb, 05 UTC) 

$0.28 (Tier 2) (Feb, 05 - Feb, 12 UTC) 

$0.30 (Tier 3) (Feb, 12 - Feb, 19 UTC) 

$0.33 (Tier 4) (Feb, 19 - Feb, 26 UTC) 

$0.35 (Tier 5) (Feb, 26 - Mar, 05 UTC) 

Reserves
20,000,000 BUBO for Pre Sale @ $0.20 USD Nov, 27 2017 - Jan, 29 2018 UTC

10,000,000 BUBO for Employees, Founders, PR, Marketing, Partnerships & Contractors 

10,000,000 BUBO for Community Reserve

7,000,000 BUBO for Dispensary Reserve

3,000,000 BUBO for Bounty

Hard Cap
Hard Cap is 150,000,000 tokens (not including Pre-sale)

Token Sale

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 17

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Definition
Budbo Tokens will be the digital utilities that power and incentivize the Budbo ecosystem and platform. 
The Budbo Token provides access to the platform.

Transaction Time
Budbo Token transactions will be instant, and average transaction confirmation time will be within 
minutes. All transactions will be secured with the state-of- the-art cryptography, and blockchain integrity 
will be protected by CPU efficient ASIC resistant proof of work. This unique model allows us to fill in 
many gaps for cannabis businesses within the entire global cannabis market.

Token Details
Name: Budbo Token

Ticker: BUBO (if permitted under applicable laws)

Based on: Ethereum

Budbo Token Description

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 18

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Token Diagram
 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 19

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Budbo will engage a nationally recognized accounting firm for annual third-party reviews. 

Here are other ways we will work for transparency and community control: 

Transparency &  
Community Control

• Founders and team members who own 
Budbo Tokens will be prohibited from 
liquidating those tokens at a rate of more 
than 20% of their position within the first 
calendar year. This is to prevent dumping and 
to keep a stable token price. 

• A minimal threshold amount will be required 
for a completed token crowdsale. The token 
offering will have a series of cap levels. 
If the token crowdsale does not reach its 
minimum cap of 1 million tokens, any funds 
received during the token crowdsale will 
be returned to the original initiating wallets 
automatically. Assuming the minimum 
threshold is exceeded, but the maximum cap 
of 150 million tokens (not including Pre-sale) 

is not met, any unsold tokens will be placed 
into reserve. Any funds received after having 
reached the maximum cap of 150 million 
tokens will be automatically returned to the 
senders’ wallet. 

• Third-party recognized escrow agents will 
ensure tokens deposited for a token crowdsale 
are kept secure until the token crowdsale is 
finalized and the tokens generated. 

• The token crowdsale will be designed to 
reduce the number of large buyers (whales) 
who may want to dump tokens. Instead, the 
token crowdsale will favor smaller investors 
who are committed to the cannabis cause 
and plan on participating in the community.

BUDBO | A Comprehensive Blockchain Solution for the Cannabis Industry 20

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Date
The initial token crowdsale will take place between January 29th, 2018 and March 5th, 2018. and can 
be accessed via our website: https://www.budbo.io. We will conduct a Pre-sale for eligible purchasers 
beggining on or about November 27, 2017.

Registration
Please register for the token crowdsale so you are notified of the opening of the event. Be sure to take 
advantage of notification and prior registration so you do not miss out. 

Whitelist
There will be no whitelist event for this crowdsale. 

Accepted Currencies
The crowdsale will accept Bitcoin, Ethereum, Bitcoin Cash, PotCoin, Litecoin and Ripple.

Opening a Budbo Token Account
After the initial token crowdsale , opening a coin account with Budbo will be easy and free. Because 
Budbo is a truly unified platform, it uses peer-to-peer technology to operate with no central authority. 
The network collectively carries out the issuing of Budbo Tokens. It works anywhere, anytime, so 
business can be transacted 24/7 in any part of the world. 

Distribution
Tokens will be distributed automatically by the Budbo Smart Contract throughout the Token Sale on 
Ethereum.

How to Get Budbo Tokens 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 21

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Exchange Trading
Budbo Tokens may be available for trading in the future if and when applicable laws permit for such 
trading, but no assurances can be given that such trading will ever take place.

Security
Budbo will be built on Ethereum – a decentralized platform for applications that run exactly as 
programmed without any chance of fraud, censorship or third-party interference.

All transactions will be secured with state-of-the art cryptography, and the blockchain integrity will 
be protected by CPU-efficient, ASIC-resistant proof of stake. This unique model will allow us to speed 
transactions for cannabis-related businesses.

Popularity
Budbo already has a vast user base in place and is listing over 2,000 dispensaries, and over 250,000 
products. Concurrently, cryptocurrencies have become the meeting point between innovative 
technologies and traditional retail, so the introduction of our own Budbo Tokens will accelerate the 
process of adoption and data exchange. 

Awareness
Budbo is better known than newer platforms that have not yet established the same profile. Similarly, 
blockchain technology has maintained its reputation as an asset, which retains its value even in the face 
of economic uncertainty and has exhibited multiple benefits for the growth of businesses that adopt it.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 22

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Summary

Budbo Platform and  
        Mobile App

Budbo takes advantage of the digital and 
verifiable nature of blockchain to solve the 
fragmentation of the cannabis market and the 
marginalization of businesses and consumers. 
Blockchain smart contracts are ideal for 
recording and facilitating the exchange of 
value, goods, services, and private data. Putting 
cannabis data and transactions on blockchain 

smart contracts will increase the speed of 
service, and save dispensaries and growers 
hundreds of thousands in reduced paperwork.

Globally the Budbo smart contracts can 
immediately serve a number of businesses 
within the cannabis industry. Blockchain smart 
contracts can instantly and accurately register 
and record the following events:

• Blockchain-based smart contracts provide accountability in a way no other technology can. 
The blockchain provides an immutable ledger that offers permanent verification of every past 
transaction, so it builds trust

• Stores all product lifecycle events forever in an easy-to-retrieve system

• Allows multiple apps to simultaneously interact with any piece of information

• Offers anonymous patient identification

• Facilitates peer-to-peer transactions on a national level

• Enables social interaction between users in a fun, immersive environment

The combination of decentralized encryption, anonymity, immutability, and scalability transforms 
Budbo into the ultimate online ecosystem for the facilitation of interactions between users, 
dispensaries, growers and couriers within the cannabis sector. Utlizing the Budbo Token as the API key 
for data exchange will put a demand on this value.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 23

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Budbo will use its own blockchain to focus on 
solving problems that are unique to the cannabis 
industry. It achieves this by building on the 
strength of a well-established system to offer 
applications, create a new cryptocurrency, and 
display valuable analytics. This allows it to run 
its functions exactly as programmed without 

any chance of fraud, censorship or third-party 
interference.

As such, Budbo provides not only a groundbreaking 
blockchain-crypto based ecosystem but also a 
powerful, modular toolset to build interactions 
between all channels in the cannabis sector.

Budbo Functionality
Budbo is a complete technology solution 

that benefits cannabis dispensaries, growers, 

couriers and users. Its functionality goes beyond 

seed-to-sale tracking by normalizing the cash-

intensive marketplace, powering revenue for 

merchants and enabling consumers to enjoy a 
speedy, convenient, safe and private way to pay.

Budbo has a unique working model that benefits 
all parties in the legal cannabis trade. The 
principal features of Budbo’s business model are: 

• Supplies/Equipment Ordering ― Growers can 
use the Purchasing Management module 
to receive real-time updates regarding 
purchasing trends and inventory balance.

• Inventory Management ― Budbo’s Inventory 
Control module allows for efficient 
management of all stages of the product 
lifecycle. This module enables growers and 
dispensaries to manage inventory levels 
and maintain tight controls on inventory 
replenishment, minimizing excess stock and 
ensuring timely order fulfilment.

• Seed to Sale Tracking ― The Seed to Sale 
Tracking Module enables businesses to 
track and manage inventory—from planting 
and growing all the way through processing, 

product shipping and, ultimately, to 
transactions at the PoS in dispensaries. 

• Logistics ― Budbo integrates with the logistics 
department to offer real-time insight into 
the status of the order delivery. Geo-fencing 
verification and GPS tracking provide peace of 
mind to both consumers and retailers.

• Point of Sale ― Budbo’s system consists 
of a mobile application, a PoS integration 
product, and a banking portal and online 
plug-in for businesses. Budbo facilitates 
mobile payments and PoS services including 
Android and iOS apps for consumers.

• Client Management ― Store, access and 
manage one patient and Customer Database 
with information on user, strain preference, 

BUDBO | A Comprehensive Blockchain Solution for the Cannabis Industry 24

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



time data, and geo-location of user, and 
proximity to dispensaries.

• Analytics ― Dispensaries can access 
real-time updates on targeted user likes, 
preferences, and products most likely to be 
purchased to improve their product offering 
and increase sales. With the use of the smart 
feature Grow Forecasting, they can meet 
dispensary demand ahead of time.

• User Interactions ― Users can interact in a 
fun, immersive environment on the Budbo 

platform. They can share reviews, play 
games, message and connect in one place.

• Retail Location Forecasting ― Startups 
looking to open a dispensary can compare 
locations and access customer metrics to 
see which towns and neighborhoods hold 
the greatest potential. 

• Business Modelling ― Use our real time 
patient and consumer analytics to know 
which flower and products to stock your 
shelves with.  Increase sales!

Budbo Connect
Budbo Connect is built for business intelligence and proactive decision-making. Our goal is to help 
dispensaries sell more products. Budbo connect gives dispensaries user-generated data laid out in a 
simple, elegant interface.

We expect the increase in foot traffic, improved analytics, and exceptional customer service to cement 
strong, longstanding relationships with all of our dispensary partners.

Daily user interactions drive the core analytical engine of “Budbo Connect” – our backend dashboard 
for dispensaries. These key analytics ultimately provide the final solution for dispensary owners and 
prospectors, allowing them to know which strains to grow and exactly which products to stock in 
order to increase sales and grow revenue.

BudboTrax
BudboTrax is built to establish order, peace of-mind, and real-time visibility in the transport of cannabis 
products throughout the cannabis ecosystem.  Blockchain immutable ledgers provide historical record 
keeping for multiple uses, including government compliance.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 25

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



• Real-time GPS tracking of high value 
cannabis products on all shipments.

• Shipment documents scanned and stored in 
the cloud.

• Adjustable geo-fences and  
automated alerts.

• Driver “SOS” button to immediately report 
emergencies to authorities.

• Real-time verifiable pickup and delivery 
confirmations.

• Confidence of knowing where your product 
is at all times.

Building strong relationships with dispensaries will provide an avenue to offer the “BudboTrax” GPS 
tracking service. 

Analytical data reports are also available to growers and the broader cannabis network. BudboTrax is 
a mobile-powered GPS logistics tool built to monitor the entire cannabis supply chain – from grower to 
end-user. 

Dispensaries and other vested parties will have full control over and insight into all cannabis movements 
via the Budbo Connect Dashboard. 

From there, products will be tracked during transport by GPS via a free driver app that is part of the 
Budbo Tech Ecosystem.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 26

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Seed-to-Sale is an umbrella term used in the 
cannabis industry to refer to software and 
services that help businesses track and manage 
inventory—from planting and growing all the way 
through processing, product shipping and, finally, 
to transactions at the PoS in dispensaries. Seed-to-
sale systems help cannabis businesses keep track 
of assets and sales as well as get in touch with 
consumers and manage the complex hurdles of 
state-by-state legal regulations and compliance.

As the recreational marijuana sector moves 
from the black market to the retail market, the 
demand for cannabis looks more and more 
lucrative with consumers who:

• Use cannabis, but less than once per 
month: 11.6 million occasional users

• Use between one and 20 times per 
month: 11.1 million regular users

• Use more than 20 times per month: 7.1 
million heavy users

The 2017 National Survey on Drug Use and Health 
statistics from the federal Substance Abuse and 
Mental Health Services Administration estimates 
that 29.7 million Americans 12 or older had used 
cannabis within the past year. Of those, 18.1 

million consumed cannabis within the past month. 
For our purposes, let’s assume the people who 
smoked within the past month are regular users, 
and the rest are occasional users. This means that 
in 2017, about 11.6 million are smoking at least 
once a month, and 6.5 million people are using 
marijuana less than once a month. The report also 
estimates that 7.1 million people 12 or older are 
using marijuana more than 20 times per month.

It’s important to draw these lines when it comes 
to usage, because it makes a difference when 
it comes to estimating how frequently people 
buy marijuana. Because we’re estimating the 
number of full-time marijuana dealers, we only 
want to look at regular and heavy smokers. 

Let’s assume that people who use pot less than 
once per month probably get it from friends. 
For the next step, we use data from a study 
performed by RAND Corp, which focuses on the 
reasonable frequency of users who buy their 
products from a professional marijuana dealer, 
including dispensaries. This means that 11.1 
million people are buying cannabis once a month, 
and 7.1 million people are buying twice a month. 
This comes out to 29.2 million professional 
marijuana transactions per month in the United 
States. If we assume that a standard marijuana 
dispensary is open eight hours a day, every day, 
and makes one transaction per hour; that comes 
out to about 240 sales per month per dispensary.

Market Context 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 27

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



With 29.2 million marijuana transactions per 
month and 240 transactions per dealer, 121,600 
dispensaries are needed to satisfy demand. This 
seems surprisingly reasonable. That’s a little less 
than the number of family physicians in 2011.

There are already a couple of big players in the 
seed-to-sale space. Weed tech startups such 
as Flowhub are competing with pharmaceutical 
incumbents, including BioTrackTHC and MJ 
Freeway, for state-by-state government compliance 
contracts. Others such as KIND Financial have 
gotten tech giants involved, hosting their Agrisoft 
seed-to-sale platform on Microsoft Azure.

But while other blockchain startups focus 
predominantly on helping businesses work 

around regulatory restrictions, Budbo centers on 
the consumer-business relationship within the 
cannabis industry. Budbo gives users full control 
over their blockchain-based transaction history 
that’s linked to local dispensaries and seed-to-
sale systems, with Budbo as the middleman that 
facilitates the connection.

As an enterprise-level solution utilizing 
the blockchain-crypto ecosystem, Budbo 
integrates and accelerates a whole new 
generation of dispensaries and growers to 
thrive in the rapidly growing and increasingly 
legalized cannabis industry. Budbo Token 
transactions will be instant and secured with 
state-of- the-art cryptography. 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 28

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Marijuana’s status as a Schedule 1 drug means state marijuana operations are federally regulated as 
illegal enterprises. Despite the obstacles, legal marijuana has managed to go mainstream on a state-by-
state basis, transforming the way Americans view and use cannabis.

Federal regulation on the legality of transport, sale and distribution of cannabis creates major obstacles 
for companies to establish, manage and grow their business. The lack of a fast, reliable and readily 
available payment method contributes to the multitude of issues businesses face, making it difficult to 
attract and retain customers.

The adoption of blockchain technology is the soundest solution to solving the fragmentation of the 
cannabis market and the marginalization of businesses and consumers. By integrating smart contracts 
and blockchain into its working model, Budbo targets the very basis of every digital transaction, 
exchange of value, goods and services, and private data. A host of economic, legal, regulatory, and 
technological hurdles must be scaled before we see widespread adoption of blockchain technology in 
the cannabis market - but first movers are making incredible strides.

The Budbo blockchain gives government agencies the solution for economic, legal, regulatory, and 
technological hurdles they have long faced.   

Government Regulations

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 29

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



• Nov 2016 Launch of Budbo in Google Play and Apple App Store

https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.budbo

https://itunes.apple.com/us/app/budbo/id1146901226

• Dec 2016 Complex News publishes first article and video on Budbo

http://www.complex.com/life/2016/12/tinder-for-weed-budbo

• Dec 2016 Total Frat Move publishes article on Budbo

https://totalfratmove.com/budbo-tinder-for-weed/

• Feb 2017 Budbo takes part in Super Bowl Bash in Houston, TX

Project Roadmap

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 30

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



• March 2017 LaneAxis Combination

https://theduber.club/weblog/2017/05/26/budbo-inc-whats-new/

• April 2017 Budbo is ranked the #1 4/20 App by Herb.co

http://herb.co/2017/04/20/420-apps/

• April 2017 4/20 Party with WeedTV

• May 2017 First Cannabis Delivery tracked using Budbo Trax

• June 2017 Begin Token Sale Research

• September 2017 MJAC Conference in Los Angeles

https://mjac2017.com/

• November 2017 Token Sale Presale

• January 2018 Token Sale

• February 2018 Begin Development on v2.0

• March 2018 Begin Blockchain Implementations

• May 2018 Launch Budbo App v2.0

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 31

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Budbo owes its success in part to its diverse team of talent. Our founding members posses vision and 
depth of knowledge of the cannabis industry, blockchain cryptocurrency, finance, accounting, B2B and 
B2C marketing. Presently, our team consists of: 

Team

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 32

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Team Cont.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 33

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Advisory Board

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 34

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Advisory Board Cont.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 35

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Rick Burnett - CEO

Rick’s extensive knowledge of mobile technology and logistics makes him a natural fit to lead the 
Budbo team. Rick spent 15 years researching and developing a mobile-based platform that provides 
real-time tracking over freight movements. This is the basis of the Budbo Trax feature. 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/rick-burnett-102b9116/

Luke Patterson – President, Co-Founder

A data-driven entrepreneur and blockchain specialist, Luke’s wealth of experience is replete with years 
as an information architect and mobile app developer.  Working with both start-ups and Fortune 500 
companies alike, Luke’s works have been featured in Wired, TechCrunch, Complex, and Business Insider.  

https://www.linkedin.com/in/luke-patterson-979b82129/

Jacob Patterson – CTO, Co-Founder

Jacob relies on his vast experience as a developer to ensure Budbo remains the leader in cannabis 
technology innovation, including its evolution into the blockchain ecosystem. Jacob has held senior 
developer roles with Fortune 500 companies including U.S. Bancorp and media giant Comcast. 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/pattersonjacob/

Gary Heitz – COO, Co-Founder

A seasoned sales executive with deep experience in technology and digital media, Gary has generated 
tens of millions of dollars in revenue for Token Salenic companies such as Dell and Google. Quickly 
ascending to executive leadership positions at both companies, Gary structured complex sales 
initiatives, negotiated with Fortune 500 clients, and routinely exceeded sales goals by wide margins.  At 
Google, Gary was entrusted as lead Sales Executive for the company’s DoubleClick demand side media 
platform, as well as Google’s DoubleClick Bid Manager and Ad Network. 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/gary-heitz-36317a3/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 36

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Nick Heldreth – CMO, Co-Founder

A born marketer and entrepreneur, Nick co-founded Budbo after recognizing the tremendous market 
opportunity that exists in the Cannabis space. Nick has over a decade of sales, marketing and customer 
service experience in financial services, entertainment, transportation, digital marketing, and real estate. 
His ventures have included acquisitions of a real estate company and a transportation company, both 
of which he transformed into highly profitable enterprises. 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/nickheldreth/

Divyashish Jindal – Blockchain Engineer

I love to build innovative and sustainable solutions of the problems I come across to help build a better 
living world. Also, I believe in evolution to my core and I constantly thrive to create better version of me 
and the people around. 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/divyashish/

Ihor Pidruchny – Blockchain Engineer

Designing decentralized blockchain based open source platform for logistics industry.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/ihorpidruchny/

Prateek Dimri – Business Analyst

With three years in the blockchain space, I assist with planning and monitoring, strategy, product 
conceptualization, market research, and predictive analysis.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/prateekdimri/

Blake Krohn – VP of Engineering

20 years of experience working as a software engineer for a diverse range of industries and companies 
worldwide. In addition to his past position at McAfee, Inc. and as team lead for various startups, Blake’s 
most recent role as CTO for an industry-leading retailer has enabled him to understand and practice the 
comprehensive knowledge and leadership skills to be an effective, results-oriented VP of Engineering 
for Budbo.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/blake-krohn-7303691/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 37

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Mason Burnett – Blockchain Information Systems

Mason is a marketing visionary whose ideas have helped elevate private companies and institutions 
of higher education. Tenacious and focused on winning, Mason has immersed himself in the cannabis 
industry to help keep Budbo ahead of the competition.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/mason-burnett-a6a18896/

Andrew Rivera – Director of Communications

Andrew is an award-winning former TV news journalist with corporate experience in Public Relations 
and Marketing. Technically and editorially savvy, he thrives on every opportunity to create imaginative 
writing and visuals that slice through the clutter.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/andrewriveracommunications/

David Levy – Canada Operations

A seasoned developer, David’s entrance into the technology universe with the design and development 
of AUTO INFO, the first online auto trader profiling site. David’s expertise spans a number of industries, 
including his design of an advanced elevator control system..

https://www.linkedin.com/in/david-levy-a3a647112/

Chase Cameron – Account Executive

Building authority for brands in multiple industries across the globe.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/chase-cameron-aba791a4/

Leland Price – Account Executive

https://www.linkedin.com/in/leland-price-401b9b151/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 38

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Alex Williams – Account Executive

Alex Williams

Alex began his career in transportation and logistics by working for a forward-thinking global insurance 
brokerage. Alex specialized in risk management, helping clients minimize risk through data-backed 
insight and innovative solutions.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/alexwilliams23/

Tom Reid – Account Executive

Tom is an experienced transportation professional with over a decade of freight brokerage operations 
and sales experience. His previous role with one of the nation’s largest logistics firms allowed him to 
focus on building relationships with top enterprise clients in the industry.  Tom’s specialty is identifying 
and discovering opportunities for cost savings through strategic partnerships and processes.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/thomas-reid-83957b15/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 39

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Randal Crowder – Co-Founder - TEXO Ventures 

Randall has deployed more than $40M over the past 10 years with a specific focus on tech-enabled 
health services and companies leveraging blockchain technology. Randall is a co-founder and 
Managing Partner at TEXO Ventures..

https://www.linkedin.com/in/randallcrowder/

Mary Hang – CEO - ICOHolder

ICOHolder tracker CEO, ex-Amazon software engineer with 5 years of experience in the Blockchain 
industry and total of 9 years of experience in IT. She developed the ICO tracker from scrap and 
consulted over 80 different ICO’s so far. Being an expert in different fields of blockchain, she has 
successfully managed team of 30 crypto experts.

https://icoholder.com/

Amarpreet Singh – Blockchain & ICO Advisor

Technology/Digital enthusiast and a seasoned professional with years of experience in Tech industry – 
operations, consulting and innovation. He is a certified Cloud (Microsoft and AWS) specialist. Known for 
versatility and flexibility. Excellent analytic, strategic, leadership skills and a team player at its best.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/amarpreetsingh2/

Seul Lee – VP of Sales & Marketing of ATARAD

In his time as a marketer, Ben has attracted over $75M in sales and now leads the first multidisciplinary 
agency to specialize in blockchain development. Ben’s Ledger Agency specializes in technology-driven 
marketing, strategic project planning, social media, and community building, applying best practices to 
the Cryptocurrency space for a number of start-ups and ICOs.

http:// http://atarad.io/

Advisors

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 40

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Justin Schmidt – GP and Founder at Translunar Crypto

Justin Schmidt, launched Translunar Crypto Ventures last year based in Austin, Tx and the Cayman 
Islands. Translunar has a strategic partnership with Venture One (blockchain equity investors). Mr. 
Schmidt was an early employee at HomeAway (IPO then sold to Expedia), Sidecar (acquired by 
GM), Google, Groupon (IPO), RealPage (IPO), and Carvana (IPO). Translunar was an early investor 
in blockchain ICO’s including Filecoin, WAX, Mobius, GameFlip, Sense, Pryze, TransitNet, Kudos, 
Blockstack, PROPS, Pin Protocol, Current, Origin, and Surf Air.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/justin-schmidt-9464536/

Jonathan Millet – CEO - NewsBTC Media Group

Jonathan Millet is CEO of NewsBTC Media Group, one of the leading media news agencies in the 
concurrency and blockchain space. Jonathan spends much of his times helping small, medium and 
large companies take themselves off the ground and rise to the top in a short time period.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/jonathan-millet-0a37179/

Justin Jovanovic – COO - investFeed

Justin is the Chief Operating Officer of investFeed - the leading cryptocurrency social network – 
powered by over 105,000+ crypto specific investors and enthusiasts since transitioning into Beta in 
January 2018. Justin has been a part of several successful ICOs, including investFeed’s, and has a 
passion for progressive decentralization and blockchain innovation. Previously, Justin had a lengthy 
career in traditional equities, specifically supervising risk management for several US proprietary 
trading groups in addition to creating and operating a disruptive software and event ticketing business.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/justin-jovanovic-7a48b8b6/

Amy Berliner – Founder/CEO - Aegis Biotech

As Founder/CEO of Aegis Biotech, Amy applies more than two decades of Senior Executive experience 
to the benefit of her company and to her research, and development team.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/aegis-biotech-b57544a0/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 41

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Ty Duffy – CEO - Low Spark, Inc.

Ty Duffy is the owner and CEO of Low Spark Inc. LOW Spark is the largest distribution supply chain for 
cannabis and cannabis infused products in Colorado. LowSpark moves an average of 1 unit every 47 
seconds with a vast network of contacts in the Cannabis Industry.

https://www.lowsparkinc.com/

Tarun Jaswani – Partner - Interfacemax

Tarun Jaswani is a partner at Interfacemax, a Digital Asset Fund focussed on blockchain projects 
that create value through real world application. A techpreneur with past experience in Virttual Reality, 
Gaming and Adtech.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/tmjaswani/

Benjamin Finch – Strategic Advisor

In his time as a marketer, Ben has attracted over $75M in sales and now leads the first multidisciplinary 
agency to specialize in blockchain development. Ben’s Ledger Agency specializes in technology-driven 
marketing, strategic project planning, social media, and community building, applying best practices to 
the Cryptocurrency space for a number of start-ups and ICOs.

https://www.ledgeragency.com/

Larre Johnson – Strategic Communications Advisor

Larre is a 30-year advertising, marketing and strategic communications veteran. His campaigns have 
helped brand and build two disruptive enterprises into multi-$B businesses. A former senior writer on 
Apple, Larre has won virtually every creative and effectiveness award the industry bestows.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/larre-johnson-b2898520/

John David Carrasco – CEO - CannLiv

John David Carrasco is President and CEO of Cannliv and John David Global.  Cannliv has locations in 
Houston, TX, Denver CO and in South America (Colombia). Having chaired the Cannabis Caucus for the 
Texas Democratic Party during the last election cycle has resulted a leadership role amongst activists 
in the Cannabis space.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/johndavidcarrasco/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 42

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Tyarre Allen – Executive Vice President - CannLiv

Tyarre Allen is the Executive Vice President for Cannliv Wellness and Operations Director for Cannliv 
Colorado. Tyarre’s experience in start-up’s and his role as a Vice President of Administration & 
Operations has lead to building developing organizations around the world within the Direct Sales 
Industry. Tyarre is someone who is no stranger to cultivating things with a sincere vision of, unity, work 
hard, working smart and diligently working through any situation.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/tyarre-allen-47024a52/

Michael Hodges – Co-Founder - ADVFN

Michael Hodges has over 30 years experience in computer software development and publishing, while 
working with multi-user and Internet projects for many years. He Co-founded On-line plc which in the 
process of changing its name to Online Blockchain PLC and ADVFN PLC both listed on the London 
Stock exchange AIM. He is currently Chairman of On-line PLC, and ADVFN PLC..

https://www.advfn.com/

Michael Noel – CEO - Blockchain Consultants

Blockchain technology is moving, morphing and changing so quickly that it’s challenging to keep 
up with, even for those of us who work in within the area.  Add to this the fact that this is a relatively 
new technology with origins going back just a few decades for the core technology, but the unique 
combination we now know as Blockchain dates from 2007/2008, barely a ten-year-old infant at this 
point.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/michaelnoel/

David Ashley – CTO - ILF, LLC

I have over 20 years of experience working on and developing business intelligence and eCommerce 
systems. Currently, I work as Interactive Life Form’s (ILF) Senior Transition Contractor, improving 
internal systems and services used by various administrative departments world wide.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/david-ashley-885b074/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 43

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Willie Kennon – President - Pineapple Enterprises

Willie is the President of Pineapple Enterprises; a Cannabis based holdings company with 110 acres 
of premium farm land in Southern Oregon. Pineapple Enterprises is well on its way to producing over 
10,000 lbs of flower per year.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/willie-kennon-363a5717/

Jack Finkelstein – Senior Technology Advisor

Qualified with over 25 years of broad sales and sales management, product design and merchandising 
experience. Jack has helped a number of companies bring existing and new products to new markets 
as well as building his own medical compliance packaging company.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/jackfinkelstein/

Roy De Gouveia – Strategic Advisor

An Entrepeneur turned Ecopreneur. Roy’s background was in Restaurants before turning to renewable 
energy! He has businesses in South Africa in Biofuel, Fertilizer & Containerized Hydroponic farming.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/roydegouveia/

Antonio Russo – Co-Founder - District 8

Antonio Russo has been part of the cannabis industry since 2010.  He currently is part of a non-profit 
that helps families with financial assistance and education in-regards to the benefit of cannabis.  
Antonio also is a co - founder of District 8 a retail wholesale cultivation and manufacturing ecosystem.  
The focus is clean / natural / sustainable products with a low carbon footprint.  He is also the lead on 
the branding of both out-fits and continues to surround himself with inspiring people in the cannabis 
space to create something special.

https://www.thedistrict8.com/

David Fowler – CEO - Digital Shyft

David Fowler, a career entrepreneur and a 20-year C-level veteran is the Co-Founder of Southwest 
Cannabis Conference & Expo, Pro Athletes Pro Cannabis and currently is the CEO/Founder of Digital 
Shyft, a digital creative, and marketing agency for the cannabis industry.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/davidfowler/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 44

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Richard Levy – Senior Technology Advisor

Richard provides expertise in all aspects of Product Management, Development, Hosting and Support. 
Richard has over 35 years experience in the software space, leading large and small teams to develop 
enterprise and Cloud based platforms to support applications in the banking, corporate legal, insurance, 
governance risk and compliance (GRC) industries.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/richard-levy-2812b6/

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 45

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



We have formed an extensive network of partnerships and collaborations with large players in the 
cannabis industry. The Budbo app currently boasts over 75,000 unique users. We are also working 
with 2,000 suppliers in the cannabis sector who support our business model and goal of establishing 
a unified platform for secure, safe and fast transactions, as well as frictionless interaction between all 
parties in compliance with federal and state regulations.

Partners

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 46

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



1. Budbo Token Sale - Risk Factors 

Risk Factors

You should carefully consider and evaluate 
each of the following risk factors and all other 
information contained in the Terms before 
deciding to participate in the Budbo Token 
Generation Event (referred to herein as the 
“Token Sale” or “Budbo Token Generation Event”). 
To the best of Budbo’s, and the entity creating 
and issuing the Budbo Tokens - Budbo Token 
International LTD.’s (the “Company”) knowledge 
and belief, all risk factors which are material to you 
in making an informed judgment to participate in 
the Budbo Token Generation Event have been set 
out below. If any of the following considerations, 
uncertainties or material risks develops into actual 
events, the business, financial position and/or 
results of operations of the Company and the 
maintenance and level of usage of the Budbo 
app and platform and the Budbo Tokens could 
be materially and adversely affected. In such 
cases, the trading price of Budbo Tokens (in the 
case where they are listed on a cryptocurrency 
exchange) could decline due to any of these 
considerations, uncertainties or material risks, and 
you may lose all or part of your Budbo Tokens. 

There is no prior market for Budbo Tokens and 

the Budbo Token Generation Event may not 
result in an active or liquid market for the Budbo 
Tokens. Prior to the Budbo Token Generation 
Event, there has been no public market for the 
Budbo Tokens. Budbo Tokens maybe available for 
trading in the future if and when appicable laws 
permit for such trading, but not assurances can 
be given that approval of such trading will ever 
be obtained. Furthermore, even if such approval 
is granted by a cryptocurrency exchange, there 
is no assurance that an active or liquid trading 
market for the Budbo Tokens will develop, or 
if developed, will be sustained after the Budbo 
Tokens have been made available for trading 
on such cryptocurrency exchange. There is 
also no assurance that the market price of 
the Budbo Tokens will not decline below the 
original purchase price (the “Purchase Price”). 
The Purchase Price may not be indicative of the 
market price of the Budbo Tokens after they have 
been approved for trading on a cryptocurrency 
exchange. 

A Budbo Token is not a currency issued by any 
central bank or national, supra-national or quasi-
national organization, nor is it backed by any 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 47

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



hard assets or other credit. The Company is not 
responsible for, nor does it pursue, the circulation 
and trading of Budbo Tokens on the market. 
Trading of Budbo Tokens will merely depend 
on the consensus on its value between the 
relevant market participants. No one is obliged to 
purchase any Budbo Token from any holder of the 
Budbo Token, including the purchasers, nor does 
anyone guarantee the liquidity or market price of 
Budbo Tokens to any extent at any time. 

Furthermore, Budbo Tokens may not be resold 
to purchasers who are citizens or permanent 
residents of China or Singapore or any other 
jurisdiction where the purchase of Budbo Tokens 
may be in violation of applicable laws (including 
but not limited to laws regulating controlled 
substances, such as cannabis). Accordingly, the 
Company cannot ensure that there will be any 
demand or market for Budbo Tokens, or that the 
Purchase Price is indicative of the market price of 
Budbo Tokens after they have been made available 
for trading on a cryptocurrency exchange. 

Future sales or issuance of the Budbo Tokens 
could materially and adversely affect the 
market price of Budbo Tokens. 

Any future sale or issuance of the Budbo Tokens 
would increase the supply of Budbo Tokens in 
the market and this may result in a downward 
price pressure on the Budbo Token. The sale or 
distribution of a significant number of Budbo 
Tokens outside of the Budbo Token Generation 
Event (including but not limited to the sales of 
Budbo Tokens undertaken after the completion 
of the initial crowdsale, issuance of Budbo 

Tokens to persons other than purchasers for 
purposes of community initiatives, business 
development, academic research, education 
and market expansion and issuance of Budbo 
Tokens as a reward to users of the Budbo 
platform), or the perception that such further 
sales or issuance may occur, could adversely 
affect the trading price of the Budbo Tokens. 

Negative publicity may materially and 
adversely affect the price of the Budbo Tokens 

Negative publicity involving the Company, Budbo, 
Inc. (the Budbo Token project’s operating entity 
organized under the laws of the state of Delaware, 
USA), the Budbo platform, the Budbo Tokens or 
any of the key personnel of the Company or Budbo, 
Inc., regulation of cannabis in the US or worldwide, 
and/or regulation of cryptocurrencies in the US or 
worldwide, may materially and adversely affect the 
market perception or market price of the Budbo 
Tokens, whether or not it is justified. 

We may not be able to pay any anticipated 
rewards in the future. 

There is no assurance that there will be sufficient 
engagement in the Budbo platform such that 
you will receive any rewards anticipated to 
be distributed to active users of the Budbo 
platform. Further, even in the event there is 
substantial engagement and interactions among 
the users and the Budbo platform, there is no 
assurance you personally will receive any part 
of the rewards. This is because the ability of the 
Company to pay any reward to you will depend 
on the future results of operations and the future 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 48

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



business and financial condition of the Company 
and/or Budbo, Inc., and there is no assurance of 
the future results of operations and the future 
business and financial condition of the Company 
or Budbo, Inc. 

There is no assurance of any success of Budbo 
Platform or any Future Business Line. 

The value of, and demand for, the Budbo Tokens 
hinges heavily on the performance of the Budbo 
platform and the continuous active engagement 
of its users and success of its contemplated 
business lines. There is no assurance that 
the Budbo platform will gain traction after its 
launch and achieve any commercial success. 
Furthermore, there is no assurance that any 
of the business lines contemplated by Budbo, 
Inc. will be launched and generate sufficient 
customer traction. Such contemplated business 
lines currently include but are not limited to: (a) 
create an immutable ledger for all legal cannabis 
industry related data via the Budbo application 
and intelligence tool, (b) offer payment for legal 
cannabis industry related services and supplies 
through Budbo Tokens, (c) organize and unite 
global cannabis legalization efforts through the 
Budbo platform, and (d) bring standardization of 
licensing, transactions, supply chain, inventory 
management, delivery, tracking and ID verification 
through the Budbo application and business 
intelligence platform. Although Budbo, Inc. has 
performed several market studies testing the 
demand for the Budbo platform with relatively 
positive results, the Budbo platform has not been 
fully developed and finalized and is subject to 

further changes, updates, and adjustments prior to 
its launch. Such changes may result in unexpected 
and unforeseen effects on its projected appeal to 
users, possibly due to the failure to meet users’ 
preconceived expectations based on the beta 
version, and hence, impact its success. While 
the Company has made every effort to provide 
a realistic estimate, there is also no assurance 
that the cryptocurrencies raised in the Budbo 
Token Generation Event will be sufficient for the 
development of the Budbo platform and/or for the 
proper structuring and licensing of the anticipated 
Budbo Token future anticipated business lines. 
For the foregoing or any other reason, the 
development of the Budbo platform and launch of 
the anticipated Budbo Token future business lines 
may not be completed and there is no assurance 
that it will be launched at all. As such, distributed 
Budbo Tokens may hold little worth or value. 

The funds raised in the Token Generation Event 
are exposed to risks of theft. 

The Company will make every effort to ensure 
that the funds received from the Budbo Token 
Generation Event will be securely held in an escrow 
wallet, which is a multi-signature address with 
access thereto by private keys held by reputable 
and trusted parties. Further, upon receipt of the 
funds from the Company, Budbo, Inc. will make 
every effort to ensure that the funds received 
by it from the Company will be securely held 
through the implementation of security measures. 
Notwithstanding such security measures, there 
is no assurance that there will be no theft of the 
cryptocurrencies as a result of hacks, sophisticated 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 49

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



cyber-attacks, distributed denials of service or 
errors, vulnerabilities or defects on the Budbo 
Token Generation Event website, in the smart 
contract(s) on which the escrow wallet and the 
Budbo Token Generation Event relies, on the 
Ethereum or any other blockchain, or otherwise. 

Such events may include, for example, flaws 
in programming or source code leading to 
exploitation or abuse thereof. In such event, 
even if the Budbo Token Generation Event is 
completed, the Company or Budbo, Inc. may not 

be able to receive the cryptocurrencies raised and 
Budbo, Inc. may not be able to use such funds for 
the development of the Budbo platform and/or 
for launching any future business line, including 
but not limited to the structuring and licensing of 
the Budbo Token future business lines. In such 
case, the launch of the Budbo platform and the 
structuring and licensing of the Budbo Token 
future business lines might be temporarily or 
permanently curtailed. As such, distributed Budbo 
Tokens may hold little worth or value. 

2. RISKS RELATING TO  
THE ESCROW WALLET 
The private keys to the escrow wallet may be 
compromised and the cryptocurrencies may 
not be able to be disbursed. 

The escrow wallet is designed to be secure. Each 
of the holders of the three (3) private keys to the 
escrow wallet will use all reasonable efforts to 
safeguard their respective keys, but in the unlikely 
event that any two (2) of the three (3) keys to the 
escrow wallet are, for any reason whatsoever, 
lost, destroyed or otherwise compromised, the 

funds held by the escrow wallet may not be 
able to be retrieved and disbursed, and may be 
permanently unrecoverable. In such event, even if 
the Budbo Token Generation Event is successful, 
the Company will not be able to receive the funds 
raised and Budbo, Inc. will not be able to use such 
funds for the development of the Budbo platform 
and the structuring and licensing of the Budbo 
Token future business lines. As such, distributed 
Budbo Tokens may hold little worth or value. 

3. RISKS RELATING TO BUDBO, INC. 
The Budbo platform is developed, operated, 
and maintained by Budbo, Inc. Any events or 
circumstances which adversely affect Budbo, 

Inc. or any of its successor operating entities 
(collectively referred to herein as “Budbo, Inc.”) 
may have a corresponding adverse effect on 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 50

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



the Budbo platform and any future business 
line, including but not limited to structuring and 
launch of the Budbo Token future business lines. 
Such adverse effects would correspondingly 
have an impact on the utility, liquidity, and the 
trading price of the Budbo Tokens. 

Budbo, Inc. may be materially and adversely 
affected if it fails to effectively manage its 
operations as its business develops and 
evolves, which would have a direct impact on 
its ability to maintain the Budbo platform and/
or launch any future business lines 

The financial technology and cryptocurrency 
industries and the legal cannabis markets in 
which Budbo, Inc. competes have grown rapidly 
over the past four years and continue to evolve 
in response to new technological advances, 
changing business models, shifting regulations 
and other factors. As a result of this constantly 
changing environment, Budbo, Inc. may face 
operational difficulties in adjusting to the 
changes, and the sustainability of Budbo, Inc. will 
depend on its ability to manage its operations, 
ensure that it hires qualified and competent 
employees, and provides proper training for its 
personnel. As its business evolves, Budbo, Inc. 
must also expand and adapt its operational 
infrastructure. Budbo, Inc.’s business relies 
on its blockchain-based software systems, 
cryptocurrency wallets or other related token 
storage mechanisms, blockchain technology 
and smart contract technology, and efficient 
real estate management. All of these systems, 
tools, and skillsets represent complex, costly, and 

rapidly changing technical infrastructure. In order 
to demonstrate continued ability to effectively 
manage technical support infrastructure for the 
Budbo platform, Budbo, Inc. will need to continue 
to upgrade and improve its data systems and 
other operational systems, procedures, and 
controls. These upgrades and improvements 
will require a dedication of resources and are 
likely to be complex and increasingly rely on 
hosted computer services from third parties 
that Budbo, Inc. does not control. If Budbo, Inc. 
is unable to adapt its systems and organization 
in a timely, efficient, and cost-effective manner 
to accommodate changing circumstances, 
its business, financial condition and results of 
operations may be adversely affected. If the 
third parties whom Budbo, Inc. relies on are 
subject to a security breach or otherwise suffer 
disruptions that impact the services Budbo, Inc. 
uses, the integrity and availability of its internal 
information could be compromised, which may 
consequently cause the loss of confidential or 
proprietary information and economic loss. The 
loss of financial, labor or other resources, and any 
other adverse effect on Budbo, Inc.’s business, 
financial condition and operations, would have 
a direct adverse effect on Budbo, Inc.’s ability to 
maintain the Budbo platform and/or to structure 
and license the anticipated Budbo Token future 
business lines. Any adverse effects affecting 
Budbo, Inc.’s business or technology are likely 
to also adversely impact the utility, liquidity, and 
trading price of the Budbo Tokens. 

We are an early stage company. Budbo, Inc. 
has a limited operating history and has received 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 51

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



limited revenues to date. If you are purchasing a 
Budbo Token, it’s because you think this is a good 
idea, that the founders can execute it better than 
their competition, and sell it to enough people 
such that the Budbo Token will succeed. You 
are taking all these things on faith, because it’s 
impossible to know what will happen. We are 
dependent upon additional capital resources 
for the continuation of our planned principal 
operations and are subject to significant risks and 
uncertainties, including failing to secure funding 
to operationalize our planned operations or failing 
to profitably operate the business. 

Our insurance may not be sufficient. We carry 
insurance that we consider adequate in regard 
to the nature of the covered risks and the costs 
of coverage. We are not fully insured against all 
possible risks, nor are all such risks insurable. 

Limited intellectual property protection may 
cause us to lose our competitive advantage and 
adversely affect our business. Our proprietary 
intellectual property is not protected by any 
patent or patent application, and, despite 
our precautions, it may be possible for third 
parties to obtain and use such intellectual 
property without authorization. We have not 
conducted formal evaluations to confirm that 
our technology and products do not or will not 
infringe upon the intellectual property rights of 
third parties. As a result, we cannot be certain 
that our technology and products do not or will 
not infringe upon the intellectual property rights 
of third parties. If infringement were to occur, 
our development, manufacturing, sales and 

distribution of such technology or products may 
be disrupted.

There are several potential competitors who 
are better positioned than we are to take the 
majority of the market.  We compete with 
other companies in the cannabis industry. 
These companies may have more personnel 
talent, economic resources and manufacturing 
relationships needed to develop a competitive 
product. Many of these manufacturers also have 
well-recognized brand names and established 
distribution and retail relationships that could 
enable them to successfully market and sell a 
competitive product. The advantage they will 
have because of their scale and distribution 
network could be difficult for us to overcome. 
As a result, it is possible that our product could 
be forced out of the market by larger, more 
established players. 

Budbo, Inc. may experience system failures, 
unplanned interruptions in its network or 
services, hardware or software defects, 
security breaches or other causes that could 
adversely affect Budbo, Inc.’s infrastructure 
network, and/ or the Budbo platform.

Budbo, Inc. is not able to anticipate any 
occurrences of hacks, cyber-attacks, distributed 
denials of service or errors, vulnerabilities 
or defects in the Budbo platform, the smart 
contracts on which the Company, Budbo, Inc., or 
the Budbo platform relies or on the Ethereum or 
any other blockchain. Such events may include, 
for example, flaws in programming or source 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 52

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



code leading to exploitation or abuse thereof. 
Budbo, Inc. may not be able to detect such hacks, 
cyber-attacks, distributed denials of service errors 
vulnerabilities or defects in a timely manner, and 
may not have sufficient resources to efficiently 
cope with multiple service incidents happening 
simultaneously or in rapid succession. 

Budbo, Inc.’s network or services, which would 
include the Budbo platform and, if successfully 
structured, licensed, and launched, the Budbo 
Token future business lines, could be disrupted 
by numerous events, including natural disasters, 
equipment breakdown, network connectivity 
downtime, power losses, or even intentional 
disruptions of its services, such as disruptions 
caused by software viruses or attacks by 
unauthorized users, some of which are beyond 
Budbo, Inc.’s control. Although Budbo, Inc. has 
taken steps against malicious attacks on its 
appliances or its infrastructure, which are critical 
for the maintenance of the Budbo platform, 
there can be no assurance that cyber-attacks, 
such as distributed denials of service, will not 
be attempted in the future, that Budbo, Inc.’s 
enhanced security measures will be effective. 
Budbo, Inc. may be prone to attacks on its 
infrastructure intended to steal information about 
its technology, financial data or user information 
or take other actions that would be damaging to 
Budbo, Inc. and/or holders of the Budbo Tokens. 
Any significant breach of Budbo, Inc.’s security 
measures or other disruptions resulting in a 
compromise of the usability, stability, and security 
of the Budbo platform may adversely affect the 
utility, liquidity and/or trading price of the Budbo 
Tokens. 

We are dependent in part on the location and 
data center facilities of third parties. Budbo, 
Inc.’s current infrastructure network is in part 
established through servers which it owns 
and houses at the location facilities of third 
parties, and servers that it rents at data center 
facilities of third parties. If Budbo, Inc. is unable 
to renew its data facility lease on commercially 
reasonable terms or at all, Budbo, Inc. may be 
required to transfer its servers to a new data 
center facility, and may incur significant costs 
and possible service interruption in connection 
with the relocation. These facilities are also 
vulnerable to damage or interruption from, 
among others, natural disasters, arson, terrorist 
attacks, power losses, and telecommunication 
failures. Additionally, the third-party providers of 
such facilities may suffer a breach of security 
as a result of third-party action, employee error, 
malfeasance or otherwise, and a third party may 
obtain unauthorized access to the data in such 
servers. Inc. and the providers of such facilities 
may be unable to anticipate these techniques or 
to implement adequate preventive measures. 

General global market and economic conditions 
may have an adverse impact on Budbo Token’s 
operating performance, results of operations, 
and cash flows. Budbo, Inc. has been and 
could continue to be affected by general global 
economic and market conditions. Challenging 
economic conditions worldwide have from 
time to time, contributed, and may continue 
to contribute, to slowdowns in the information 
technology industry at large. Weakness in 
the economy could have a negative effect on 
Budbo, Inc.’s business, operations and financial 
condition, including decreases in revenue 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 53

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



and operating cash flows, and inability to 
attract future equity and/or debt financing on 
commercially reasonable terms. Additionally, in 
a down-cycle economic environment, Budbo, 
Inc. may experience the negative effects of a 
slowdown in usage of the Budbo platform and 
may delay or cancel the structuring, licensing, 
and launch of the anticipated Budbo Token future 
business lines. Suppliers on which Budbo, Inc. 
relies for servers, bandwidth, location and other 
services could also be negatively impacted by 
economic conditions that, in turn, could have a 
negative impact on Budbo, Inc.’s operations or 
expenses. There can be no assurance, therefore, 
that current economic conditions or worsening 
economic conditions or a prolonged or recurring 
recession will not have a significant, adverse 
impact on Budbo, Inc.’s business, financial 
condition and results of operations, and hence, 
the Budbo platform and/or ability to structure, 
license, and launch the Budbo Token future 
business lines. Any such circumstances would 
then correspondingly negatively impact the 
utility, liquidity, and/or trading price of the Budbo 
Tokens.

The Company, Budbo, Inc. or the Budbo 
Tokens may be affected by newly implemented 
regulations 

Cryptocurrency trading is generally unregulated 
worldwide, but numerous regulatory authorities 
across jurisdictions have been outspoken about 
considering the implementation of regulatory 
regimes which govern cryptocurrency or 
cryptocurrency markets. Furthermore, while 

the US experiences a liberalization of cannabis 
regulations at the state level, cannabis remains 
illegal at the federal level. The Company 
or the Budbo Tokens may be affected by 
newly implemented regulations relating to 
cryptocurrencies or cryptocurrency markets, 
and/or legal cannabis industry, including 
having to take measures to comply with such 
regulations, or having to deal with queries, 
notices, requests or enforcement actions 
by regulatory authorities, which may come 
at a substantial cost and may also require 
substantial modifications to the Budbo platform 
and/or the anticipated Budbo Token future 
business lines. This may impact the appeal of 
the Budbo platform and the anticipated Budbo 
Token future business lines for users and result 
in decreased usage of the Budbo platform and 
the Budbo Tokens. Further, should the costs 
(financial or otherwise) of complying with such 
newly implemented regulations exceed a certain 
threshold, maintaining the Budbo platform and 
structuring, licensing, and launching the Budbo 
Token future business lines may no longer 
be commercially viable, and the Company or 
Budbo, Inc. may opt to discontinue the Budbo 
platform, the anticipated Budbo Token future 
business lines, and/or the Budbo Tokens. 
Further, it is difficult to predict how or whether 
governments or regulatory authorities may 
implement any changes to laws and regulations 
affecting distributed ledger technology and its 
applications, including the Budbo platform, the 
anticipated Budbo Token future business lines 
and the Budbo Tokens. 

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 54

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



The Company or Budbo, Inc. may also have to 
cease operations in a jurisdiction that makes it 
illegal to operate in such jurisdiction, or make 
it commercially unviable or undesirable to 
obtain the necessary regulatory approval(s) to 
operate in such jurisdiction. In scenarios such 
as the foregoing, the utility, liquidity, and/or 
trading price of Budbo Tokens will be adversely 
affected or Budbo Tokens may cease to be 
traded. 

Cryptographic tokens such as the Budbo 
Tokens are a relatively new and dynamic 
technology. In addition to the risks included 
in the above discussion of risk factors, there 
are other risks associated with your purchase, 
holding, and use of the Budbo Tokens, including 
those that the Company and Budbo, Inc. cannot 
anticipate. Such risks may further appear as 
unanticipated variations or combinations of the 
risks discussed above. 

4. Risks relating to the U.S.  
federal laws affecting the legal 
cannabis industry.
Certain activities involving marijuana remain 
illegal under US federal laws. Such activities 
include but are not limited to: (i) distribution of 
marijuana to minors, (ii) transporting marijuana 
from states where it is legal to other states, (iii) 
drugged driving and other adverse public health 
consequences, (iv) growing marijuana on public 
lands, (v) marijuana possession or use on federal 
property, and (vi) other criminal activity or violence 
associated with the sale of marijuana. 

To the extent the Company and/or Budbo, Inc. 
may not prevent certain of its users from using 
Budbo Tokens in violation of U.S. federal law, it 
may subject the Company and/or Budbo Token, 
Inc. to civil and/or criminal liability and the utility, 
liquidity, and/or trading price of Budbo Tokens 

will be adversely affected or Budbo Tokens may 
cease to be traded.

Trump Administration’s May Strictly Enforce 
Federal Law Criminalizing Cannabis. Cannabis 
is a categorized as a Schedule I controlled 
substance by the DEA and the U.S. Department 
of Justice and is illegal to grow, possess and 
consume under federal law. Even in those 
jurisdictions in which the use of medical 
cannabis has been legalized at the state level, 
its use remains a violation of federal law. The 
U.S. Supreme Court has ruled in United States v. 
Oakland Cannabis Buyers’ Coop. and Gonzales v. 
Raich that it is the federal government that has 
the right to regulate and criminalize cannabis, 
even for medical purposes.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 55

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Therefore, federal law criminalizing the use 
of cannabis preempts state laws that legalize 
its use for medicinal or adult-retail purposes. 
Strict enforcement of federal law regarding 
cannabis would likely result in Budbo’s inability 
to proceed with its business plan.

The previous Obama administration has 
effectively stated that it is not an efficient use 
of resources to direct federal law enforcement 
agencies to prosecute those lawfully abiding 
by state-designated laws allowing the use and 
distribution of medical cannabis. In furtherance 
thereof, on August 29, 2013, the Department 
of Justice provided guidance to all U.S. federal 
prosecutors with respect to the enforcement of 
laws regarding cannabis via the publication of a 
memorandum authored by former US Attorney 
General James M. Cole (the “Cole Memo”). The 
Cole Memo stated that enforcement should 
be focused on eight priorities, which is to 
prevent: (1) distribution of cannabis to minors; 
(2) revenue from sale of cannabis to criminal 
enterprises, gangs and cartels; (3) transfer of 
cannabis from states where it is legal to states 
where it is illegal; (4) cannabis activity from 
being a pretext for trafficking of other illegal 
drugs or illegal activity; (5) violence of use of 
firearms in cannabis growth and distribution; 
(6) drugged driving and adverse public health 
consequences from cannabis use; (7) growth 
of cannabis on federal lands; and (8) cannabis 
possession or use on federal property.

On January 4, 2018, the U.S. Attorney General 
Jeff Sessions rescinded the Cole Memo and 
restored the “rule of law.” Such rescission 
essentially shifts federal policy from the 
hands-off approach adopted under the Obama 
administration to allowing federal prosecutors 
across the U.S. to decide individually how 
to prioritize resources to crack down on pot 
possession, distribution and cultivation of the 
drug in states where it is legal. Furthermore, the 
Trump administration has previously indicated 
that it will pursue the enforcement of federal 
cannabis laws.

While Budbo is a tech cannabis company and 
does not believe its activities involve those 
enumerated in the Cole Memo, in light of the 
rescission of the memo by the current Attorney 
General, federal prosecutors will now have 
significant discretion on their interpretation 
of these priorities, and no assurances can be 
given that federal prosecutors will agree with 
Budbo’s position. Budbo therefore cannot 
provide assurance that its actions are in 
full compliance with the Cole Memo or any 
other state or federal laws or regulations. In 
addition, there is no guarantee that the current 
administration will not further change its policy 
regarding the strict enforcement of federal laws 
or the eight listed priorities. Additionally, any 
new administration that follows could change 
this policy and decide to enforce the federal 
laws even stronger. Any such change in the 
federal government’s enforcement of current 
federal laws could cause significant financial 
damage to Budbo.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 56

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Some of Budbo’s business activities and the 
business activities of some of its users, while 
believed to be compliant with applicable state 
law, are illegal under federal law because they 
violate the Federal Controlled Substances 
Act. If Budbo or its users are closed by law 
enforcement authorities, it will materially 
and adversely affect Budbo’ business. As of 
July 19, 2017, 29 states and the District of 
Columbia have passed laws allowing some 
degree of medical use of cannabis, while four 
of those states and the District of Columbia 
have also legalized the adult-use of cannabis. 
However, under U.S. federal law, and more 
specifically the Federal Controlled Substances 
Act, the possession, use, cultivation, marketing 
and transfer of cannabis is illegal. The federal, 
and in some cases state, law enforcement 
authorities have frequently closed down 
dispensaries and investigated and/or closed 
physician offices that provide medicinal 
cannabis recommendations. To the extent 
that Budbo’s dispensary users are closed, it 
will negatively affect Budbo’s operations and 
revenue, and to the extent that it prevents 
or discourages other similar businesses 
from entering the cannabis industry, Budbo’s 
potential user base would contract, leading to 
a material negative affect on Budbo’s business 
and operations.

The cannabis industry faces strong 
opposition. It is believed by many that large 
well-funded businesses may have a strong 
economic opposition to the cannabis industry. 
Budbo believes that the pharmaceutical 

industry does not want to cede control of 
any product that could generate significant 
revenue. For example, medical cannabis will 
likely adversely impact the existing market for 
medicines sold by mainstream pharmaceutical 
companies that contain active ingredients from 
cannabis. Furthermore, the medical marijuana 
industry could face a material threat from the 
pharmaceutical industry, should marijuana 
displace other drugs or encroach upon the 
pharmaceutical industry’s products. The 
pharmaceutical industry is well funded with a 
strong and experienced lobby that eclipses the 
funding of the medical cannabis movement. 
Any inroads the pharmaceutical industry could 
make in halting or impeding the cannabis 
industry could have a detrimental impact on 
Budbo’s business and operations.

Additionally, Budbo is substantially dependent 
on continued market acceptance and 
proliferation of consumers of cannabis, medical 
marijuana and recreational marijuana. Budbo 
believes that as marijuana becomes more 
accepted the stigma associated with marijuana 
use will diminish and as a result consumer 
demand will continue to grow. While Budbo 
believes that the market and opportunity in 
the marijuana space continues to grow, Budbo 
cannot predict the future growth rate and size 
of the market. Any negative outlook on the 
marijuana industry will adversely affect Budbo’s 
business operations.

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 57

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO



Budbo and its users and clients may have 
difficulty accessing the service of banks, 
which may make it difficult for them to 
operate. Since the use of cannabis is illegal 
under federal law, there is a compelling 
argument that banks cannot accept for deposit 
funds from businesses involved with cannabis. 
While the Financial Crimes Enforcement 
Network (FinCEN) has provided guidance to 
financial institutions on how to provide services 
to marijuana-related businesses consistent 
with their Bank Secrecy Act (BSA) obligations, 
the decision to open, close, or refuse accounts 
and/or relationships are made at the discretion 
of the banking institution. Consequently, 
businesses involved in the cannabis industry 
often have trouble finding a bank willing to 
accept their business. The inability to open 
bank accounts may make it difficult for Budbo 
and its users and clients to operate

BUDBO | Global Cannabis Blockchain 58

WEB:  WWW.BUDBO.IO


